src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The APURINÃ language nouns inflect in cases.
! There are yaml tests 
! in apu/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/
! for herẽka in N-hereqka_gt-norm.yaml


LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0
@P.NounEnding.ne@+Fem:@P.NounEnding.ne@	N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0
@P.NounEnding.te@+Msc:@P.NounEnding.te@	N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem-ru_te/0
@P.NounEnding.te@+Fem:@P.NounEnding.te@	N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc-ry_te/0
@P.NounEnding.te@+Msc:@P.NounEnding.te@	N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry
@P.NounEnding.re2@+Msc:@P.NounEnding.re2@ N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc
+Msc:	N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi ! clothes marked when not possessed
@P.NounEnding.txi@+Msc:@P.NounEnding.txi@ N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi ! clothes marked when not possessed
@P.NounEnding.Ntxi@+Msc:@P.NounEnding.Ntxi@ N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/NULL !yry father always possessed. inalienable
+Msc:   N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_0/NULL !ynyru mother always possessed. inalienable
!check for morphology between yny AND ru
+Fem:   N_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON Cases
+Nom:0     #   ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:i     #   ;
+Aff:%>nhi # ; ! affected by the event described in the verb
+All:%>munhi    #   ;!to para
+Com:%>kata    #   ;!with, +Com in kpv Associative marker
+Dat:%>mukary    #   ;!to para
+Loc:%>ã   #   ;! both +Loc and +Ins

!#:0   Nouns   ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_02
+Sg: N_SUFFIXES_02-after-number ;
+Pl:%>waku N_SUFFIXES_02-after-number ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_02-after-number
@R.PN.SG1@+PxSg1:@R.PN.SG1@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL1@+PxPl1:@R.PN.PL1@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG2@+PxSg2:@R.PN.SG2@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL2@+PxPl2:@R.PN.PL2@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG3M@+PxSg3+Msc:@R.PN.SG3M@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG3F@+PxSg3+Fem:@R.PN.SG3F@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL3M@+PxPl3+Msc:@R.PN.PL3M@%>na N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL3F@+PxPl3+Fem:@R.PN.PL3F@%>na N_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@D.PN@ N_SUFFIXES_03 ;

LEXICON N_SUFFIXES_03
#;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


!! Suffixes

LEXICON n_suf
v_suf ; ! identical?
